District of Columbia statutes.
6-1506

Mayor authorized to issue rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Oct. 20, 1988, D.C. Law 7-177, § 13, 35 DCR 6158
1981 Ed., § 5-1406.
For temporary (225 day) additions, see §§ 2 to 4 of Off-Premises Wall Sign Moratorium Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-261, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3503).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see §§ 2, 3 of Bond Requirement for New Residential Property Construction on Unstable Soil Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-173, July 23, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 8267).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of §§ 6-1601 to 1603, see §§ 2 to 4 of the Off-Premises Wall Sign Moratorium Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-494, November 29, 2000, 48 DCR 68).
For temporary (90 day) addition of provisions, see §§ 2 to 4 of Bond Requirement for New Residential Property Construction on Unstable Soil Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-348, April 24, 2002, 49 DCR 4412).